Maryland, session 2026, HB1160.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article 5 – Calvert County
5–202.
The County Commissioners may appropriate a sum in an amount to be determined
by them to the [Calvert Memorial Hospital] CALVERTHEALTH MEDICAL CENTER, INC.,
AND ITS SUCCESSORS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 1 –